Nebraska, session 109, LB671.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-239 (1) If an application is rejected by the option school
district or if the resident school district rejects a request for release
under subsection (1) of section 79-237, the rejecting school district
shall provide written notification to the parent or guardian stating (a)
the specific reasons for the rejection including, for students with an
individualized education program under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., or with a diagnosed
disability as defined in section 79-1118.01, a description of services
and accommodations required that the school district does not have the
capacity to provide, and (b) the process for appealing such rejection to
the State Board of Education. Such notification shall be sent by
certified mail.
(2) The parent or legal guardian may appeal a rejection to the State
Board of Education by filing a written request, together with a copy of
the rejection notice, with the State Board of Education. Such request and
copy of the notice must be received by the board within thirty days after
the date the notification of the rejection was received by the parent or
legal guardian. Such hearing shall be held in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act and shall determine whether the procedures
of sections 79-234 to 79-241 have been followed. Any rejection based upon
capacity limitations established under section 79-238 shall be the
responsibility of the school district to prove in any appeal filed with
the state board.
(3)(a) Each Beginning July 1, 2024, and on or before July 1 of each
year thereafter, each school district shall provide as part of the report
required under subsection (2) of section 79-528, to the State Department
of Education information prescribed by the Commissioner of Education
relating to all applications received under section 79-237 rejected by
the option school district. Such information shall include, but not be
-2-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
limited to, (a) the number of applications approved and rejected in each
public school in such district, (b) an explanation why each application
was rejected, (c) whether each application for option enrollment
indicated that the student had an individualized education program under
the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400
et seq., or had been identified as a student with a disability as defined
in section 79-1118.01, and (d) whether information regarding the
requirements of subsection (4) of section 79-238 was provided to the
applicant.
(b) The Commissioner of Education shall annually compile the
information received pursuant to this subsection and provide a report on
such information electronically to the Legislature beginning on September
1, 2024, and on or before September 1 of each year thereafter. The State
Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection.
Sec. 2. Section 79-266, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-266 (1) Each Beginning July 1, 1997, each school district shall
have an alternative school, class, or educational program or the
procedures of subsection (2) of this section available or in operation
for all expelled students.
Any two or more school boards or boards of education may join
together in providing alternative schools, classes, or educational
programs. Any district may by agreement with another district send its
suspended or expelled students to any alternative school, class, or
educational program already in operation by such other district. An
educational program may include, but shall not be limited to,
individually prescribed educational and counseling programs or a
community-centered classroom with experiences for the student as an
observer or aide in governmental functions, as an on-the-job trainee, or
as a participant in specialized tutorial experiences. Such programs shall
-3-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
include an individualized learning program to enable the student to
continue academic work for credit toward graduation. The State Board
Department of Education shall include provisions adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations relating to alternative schools, classes, and
educational programs in the rules and regulations for the accreditation
of schools as adopted and promulgated pursuant to sections 79-318 and
79-703.
(2) If a district does not provide an alternative school, class, or
educational program for expelled students, the district shall follow the
procedures in this subsection prior to expelling a student unless the
expulsion was required by subsection (4) of section 79-283: A conference
shall be called by a school administrator and held to assist the district
in the development of a plan with the participation of a parent or legal
guardian, the student, a school representative, and a representative of
either a community organization with a mission of assisting young people
or a representative of an agency involved with juvenile justice. The plan
shall be in writing and adopted by a school administrator and presented
to the student and the parent or legal guardian. The plan shall (a)
specify guidelines and consequences for behaviors which have been
identified as preventing the student from achieving the desired benefits
from the educational opportunities provided, (b) identify educational
objectives that must be achieved in order to receive credits toward
graduation, (c) specify the financial resources and community programs
available to meet both the educational and behavioral objectives
identified, and (d) require the student to attend monthly reviews in
order to assess the student's progress toward meeting the specified goals
and objectives.
(3) A school district that has expelled a student may suspend the
enforcement of such expulsion unless the expulsion was required by
subsection (4) of section 79-283. The suspension may be for a period not
to exceed the length of the expulsion. As a condition of such suspended
-4-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
action, the school district may require participation in a plan pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section or assign the student to a school,
class, or educational program which the school district deems
appropriate.
At the conclusion of such suspension period, the school district
shall (a) reinstate any student who has satisfactorily participated in a
plan pursuant to subsection (2) of this section or the school, class, or
educational program to which such student has been assigned and permit
the student to return to the school of former attendance or to attend
other programs offered by the district or (b) if the student's conduct
has been unsatisfactory, enforce the remainder of the expulsion action.
If the student is reinstated, the district may also take action to
expunge the record of the expulsion action.
(4) At the conclusion of an expulsion, a school district shall
reinstate the student and accept nonduplicative, grade-appropriate
credits earned by the student during the term of expulsion from any
Nebraska accredited institution or institution accredited by one of the
six regional accrediting bodies in the United States.
Sec. 3. Section 79-308, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-308 (1) The Commissioner of Education shall organize institutes
and conferences at such times and places as he or she deems practicable.
He or she shall, as far as practicable, attend such institutes and
conferences, provide proper instructors for the same, and in other ways
seek to improve the efficiency of teachers and advance the cause of
education in the state.
(2) The Legislature finds that (a) an educator-effectiveness system
includes a quality evaluation system with the primary goal of improving
instruction and learning in every school district and (b) school
districts have an opportunity to receive training on the quality
evaluation models.
-5-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
(3) Beginning with the 2016-17 school year through the 2020-21
school year, school districts may apply to the State Department of
Education for grant funding for a period of up to two years to implement
an evaluation model for effective educators and to obtain the necessary
training for administrators and teachers for such model.
Sec. 4. Section 79-528, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-528 (1)(a) On or before July 20 in all school districts, the
superintendent shall file with the State Department of Education a report
showing the number of children from five through eighteen years of age
belonging to the school district according to the census taken as
provided in sections 79-524 and 79-578.
(b) The board of any district neglecting to take and report the
enumeration shall be liable to the school district for all school money
which such district may lose by such neglect.
(2) On or before June 30 the superintendent of each school district
shall file with the Commissioner of Education a report described as an
end-of-the-school-year annual statistical summary showing (a) the number
of children attending school during the year under five years of age, (b)
the length of time the school has been taught during the year by a
qualified teacher, (c) the length of time taught by each substitute
teacher, (d) the information required pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of
section 79-239 relating to all applications received under section
79-237, (e) the information required pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 79-11,157.01 related to certain students who display deficiencies
in reading, and (f) (d) such other information as the Commissioner of
Education directs.
(3) On or before November 1 the superintendent of each school
district shall submit to the Commissioner of Education a report described
as the annual financial report showing (i) the amount of money received
from all sources during the year and the amount of money expended by the
-6-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
school district during the year, (ii) the amount of bonded indebtedness,
(iii) such other information as shall be necessary to fulfill the
requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act
and section 79-1114, and (iv) such other information as the Commissioner
of Education directs.
(4)(a) On or before October 15 of each year, the superintendent of
each school district shall file with the commissioner the fall school
district membership report, which report shall include the number of
children from birth through twenty years of age enrolled in the district
on October 1 of a given school year. The report shall enumerate (i)
students by grade level, (ii) school district levies and total assessed
valuation for the current fiscal year, (iii) students enrolled in the
district as option students, resident students enrolled in another
district as option students, students enrolled in the district as open
enrollment students, and resident students enrolled in another district
as open enrollment students, and (iv) such other information as the
Commissioner of Education directs.
(b) On or before October 15 of each year prior to 2017, each
learning community coordinating council shall issue to the department a
report which enumerates the learning community levies pursuant to
subdivision (2)(b) of section 77-3442 and total assessed valuation for
the current fiscal year.
(c) When any school district fails to submit its fall membership
report by November 1, the commissioner shall, after notice to the
district and an opportunity to be heard, direct that any state aid
granted pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support
Act be withheld until such time as the report is received by the
department. In addition, the commissioner shall direct the county
treasurer to withhold all school money belonging to the school district
until such time as the commissioner notifies the county treasurer of
receipt of such report. The county treasurer shall withhold such money.
-7-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
Sec. 5. Section 79-816, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-816 (1) The State Department of Education shall create and
administer the Nebraska Teacher Apprenticeship Program. The purpose of
the program is to help recruit and increase the number of teachers
throughout the state by utilizing an apprenticeship model for training.
The program shall provide for an applicant who successfully completes the
program to obtain a certificate or permit issued by the Commissioner of
Education. The department may work with standard institutions of higher
education as defined in section 79-807, the Department of Labor, and
other entities the State Department of Education deems necessary to
develop and implement the program.
(2) An individual may apply for participation in the program if the
individual (a) is an employee of a school approved or accredited by the
State Department of Education or (b) has a contract to begin working for
a school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education at
the start of the school year for which the individual is applying for
participation in the program.
(3) The department shall determine requirements for completion of
the program by an applicant. The requirements shall include, but need not
be limited to:
(a) The completion of a one-year apprenticeship in a classroom;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a standard institution of higher
education; and
(c) Successful completion of a subject area examination designated
and pedagogy examination created by the Commissioner of Education
department as part of the program.
(4) The Commissioner of Education shall issue a certificate to teach
as set forth pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated pursuant to sections 79-806 to 79-815 to an applicant who
successfully completes the program.
-8-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million
dollars for fiscal year 2023-24 and each fiscal year thereafter from the
Education Future Fund to the State Department of Education for the
program.
Sec. 6. Section 79-8,114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-8,114 (1) A teacher may apply to the department for a grant. The
department shall not prioritize a grant based upon the school where the
applicant teaches.
(2) A teacher is eligible to apply for:
(a) A retention one grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's second
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27;
(b) A retention two grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's fourth
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27;
(c) A retention three grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if
the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's sixth
complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska
school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27; and
(d)(i) A high-need retention grant of five thousand dollars if on or
after June 2, 2023, a teacher:
(A) Obtains an endorsement in special education, mathematics,
science, or technology , or dual credit; and
(B)(I) For an application submitted prior to April 17, 2024, signs a
contract to complete a school year of full-time employment as a teacher
at a Nebraska school in school year 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27; or
(II) For an application submitted on or after April 17, 2024, signs
a contract to complete a school year of full-time employment as a teacher
-9-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
to teach in such endorsement area at a Nebraska school in school year
2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27.
(ii) A teacher shall only be eligible to receive one high-need
retention grant.
Sec. 7. Section 79-1035, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1035 (1) (1)(a) The State Treasurer shall, on or before January
25 of each year, make a complete exhibit of all money belonging to the
permanent school fund and the temporary school fund as returned to him or
her from the several counties, together with the amount derived from
other sources, and deliver such exhibit duly certified to the
Commissioner of Education and the chairperson of the Education Committee
of the Legislature.
(b) Through 2021, the exhibit required in subdivision (1)(a) of this
section shall include a separate accounting, not to exceed an amount of
ten million dollars, of the income from solar and wind agreements on
school lands. The amount of income from solar and wind agreements on
school lands shall be used to fund the grants described in section
79-308. The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall provide the State
Treasurer with the information necessary to make the exhibit required by
this subsection. Separate accounting shall not be made for income from
solar or wind agreements on school lands that exceeds the sum of ten
million dollars.
(2) On or before February 25 following receipt of the exhibit from
the State Treasurer pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the
Commissioner of Education shall make the apportionment of the temporary
school fund to each school district as follows: From the whole amount,
there shall be paid to those districts in which there are school or
saline lands, which lands are used for a public purpose, an amount in
lieu of tax money that would be raised if such lands were taxable, to be
fixed in the manner prescribed in section 79-1036; and the remainder
-10-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
shall be apportioned to the districts according to the pro rata
enumeration of children who are five through eighteen years of age in
each district last returned from the school district. The calculation of
apportionment for each school fiscal year shall include any corrections
to the prior school fiscal year's apportionment.
(3) The Commissioner of Education shall certify the amount of the
apportionment of the temporary school fund as provided in subsection (2)
of this section to the Director of Administrative Services. The Director
of Administrative Services shall issue payments to the various districts
for the respective amounts so certified by the Commissioner of Education.
(4) For purposes of this section, agreement means any lease,
easement, covenant, or other such contractual arrangement.
Sec. 8. Section 79-11,157.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-11,157.01 (1) Each On or before July 1 of each year, each school
district shall provide in the report required pursuant to subsection (2)
of section 79-528, information as to the State Department of Education,
on forms prescribed by the Commissioner of Education department,
information relating to students in kindergarten through third grade who
display deficiencies in reading, including, but not limited to,
characteristics of dyslexia. Such information shall include, but not be
limited to, the number of students in each public school in such
district:
(a) Tested for a specific learning disability in the area of
reading, including tests that identify characteristics of dyslexia and
the results of such tests;
(b) Identified as having a reading issue, including dyslexia,
pursuant to the assessment administered under the Nebraska Reading
Improvement Act; and
(c) Identified as described in subdivision (b) of this subsection
that have shown growth on the measure used to identify the reading issue.
-11-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
(2) The Commissioner State Department of Education shall annually
compile the information received pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section and provide a report on such information electronically to the
Legislature on or before September 1 of each year. Such report shall
include, but not be limited to, the number of students who display
deficiencies in reading, including, but not limited to, characteristics
of dyslexia, by grade level in each school of the school district, unless
such information may be withheld under subdivision (1) of section
84-712.05.
(3) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 9. Section 79-3407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3407 The department shall prepare documents to be submitted by
school districts to aid the department in calculating each school
district's property tax request authority and unused property tax request
authority. Each school district shall submit such documents to the
department on or before October 15 September 30 of each year. If a school
district fails to submit such documents to the department or if the
department determines from such documents that a school district is not
complying with the limits provided in the School District Property Tax
Limitation Act, the department shall notify the school district of its
determination. The Commissioner of Education shall then direct that any
state aid granted pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act be withheld until such time as the school
district submits the required documents or complies with the School
District Property Tax Limitation Act. The state aid shall be held for six
months. If the school district complies within the six-month period, it
shall receive the suspended state aid. If the school district fails to
comply within the six-month period, the suspended state aid shall revert
to the General Fund.
-12-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
Sec. 10. Section 79-3703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3703 (1) The State Department of Education shall develop and
administer the College Pathway Program Act to provide grants on or after
July 1, 2024, to contract with eligible providers to provide services in
accordance with subsection (2) of this section to underrepresented and
low-income students in high school and postsecondary education.
(2) A provider is eligible for funding a grant pursuant to the
College Pathway Program Act if the provider offers, exclusively to
underrepresented and low-income students, educational services that
provide materials, services, and supports to help a student graduate from
high school, apply for admission to a postsecondary institution, and
complete the requirements to receive an associate degree or a
baccalaureate degree. Such educational services may include:
(a) Assistance and tutorials which help students in completing
applications for a college or university, including applying for aid
through the Free Application for Federal Student Aid or other
scholarships;
(b) Assistance and materials which help students take the
appropriate high school classes in an area or field of study a student is
interested in and any classes necessary for a student to gain acceptance
at a postsecondary institution or complete the requirements and take the
appropriate postsecondary education classes to receive an associate
degree or a baccalaureate degree; and
(c) Any other services specified pursuant to rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the State Board of Education.
(3) Eligible providers may apply to the State Department of
Education for funding a grant in a manner prescribed by the Commissioner
of Education.
Sec. 11. Section 79-3704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-13-

LB671 LB671
2025 2025
79-3704 (1) On or before December 1, 2024, and each December 1
thereafter, the State Department of Education shall electronically submit
a report to the Clerk of the Legislature regarding the College Pathway
Program Act, including, but not limited to, the recipients of funding
grants and evaluations of the effectiveness of the grant program.
(2) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the College Pathway Program Act.
Sec. 12. Original sections 79-239, 79-266, 79-308, 79-528, 79-816,
79-8,114, 79-1035, 79-11,157.01, 79-3407, 79-3703, and 79-3704, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 13. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
79-309.01 and 79-718, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-14-